Rhode Island, session 2025, SB139.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-44-21.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-44 entitled "Trespass
and Vandalism" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-44-21.1. Graffiti — Defacing private residences, offices, businesses or commercial
property.
(a)(1) Every person who shall willfully, maliciously or mischievously write upon, paint, or
otherwise deface the private property or residence of another, any office building, business or
commercial property or public building or public property, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, for
the first and second offense, said penalty shall not exceed a one thousand dollars ($1,000) fine and
community service not less than forty (40) hours and not exceeding two one hundred (200) (100)
hours cleaning and remediating graffiti vandalism on state or local properties. Every person
convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this section shall be guilty of a felony, subject to
imprisonment not exceeding two (2) years, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall
be required to perform not less than forty (40) hours and not exceeding up to three hundred (300)
hours of community service cleaning and remediating graffiti vandalism on state or local properties.
The court, upon conviction or adjudication, shall order restitution to the victim in the amount of
removal, repair, or replacement costs.
(2) If the graffiti is positioned on an overpass or an underpass and requires that traffic be
interfered with in order to remove it, or the entity responsible for the area in which the clean-up is
to take place must provide assistance in order for the removal to take place safely, the court shall

order an additional assessment of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) If the person is a minor, upon adjudication, in addition to the penalties in subsection
(a):
(1) The family court may, in addition to any other order or decree the court makes under
this chapter, order the division of motor vehicles to:
(i) Suspend the minor’s operator’s license; or
(ii) Invalidate the minor’s learner’s permit; for one year beginning the date of the order.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the family court may order the
parent or legal guardian of any minor found to have committed the crime of graffiti, to submit
restitution to the victim or victims of such graffiti by payment in money if the minor is in the
custody of and residing with such parent or guardian, and if the family court finds, after hearing,
that the graffiti was a direct result of the parent or legal guardian having neglected to exercise
reasonable supervision and control of the minor’s conduct. For the purposes of this section, liability
for compensation shall be limited to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(3) If the person violates the family court’s order to submit restitution under this section,
such person shall be guilty of contempt. The court may permit payments under this section to be
made in installments, for a period of up to seven (7) years, to be administered by the court.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000494
========
LC000494 - Page 2 of 3